Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1120.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 757. (1) The board of each community mental health services program shall appoint a recipient rights advisory committee consisting of at least not less than 6 members. The membership of the committee shall must be broadly based so as to best represent the varied perspectives of the community mental health services program's geographic area. At least Not less than 1/3 of the membership shall of the recipient rights advisory committee must be primary consumers or family members, and of that 1/3, at least not less than 1/2 shall must be primary consumers. An individual who is any of the following is prohibited from serving on a recipient rights advisory committee: (a) A current or former board member of a community mental health services program. (b) A family member of a current or former board member of a community mental health services program. (c) A current or former board member of a regional entity. (d) A family member of a current or former board member of a regional entity. (2) The recipient rights advisory committee shall do all of the following: (a) Meet at least not less than semiannually or as necessary to carry out its responsibilities. (b) Maintain a current list of members' names to be made available to individuals upon on request. (c) Maintain a current list of categories represented to be made available to individuals upon on request. (d) Protect the office of recipient rights from pressures that could interfere with the impartial, even-handed, and thorough performance of its the office of recipient rights' functions. (e) Recommend candidates for director of the office of recipient rights to the executive director, and consult with the executive director regarding any proposed dismissal of the director of the office of recipient rights. (f) Serve in an advisory capacity to the executive director and the director of the office of recipient rights. (g) Review and provide comments on the report submitted by the executive director to the community mental health services program board under section 755. (h) If designated by the board of the community mental health services program, serve as the appeals committee for a recipient's appeal under section 784. (i) Meetings of the recipient rights advisory committee are subject to the open meetings act, Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976, being sections 15.261 to 15.275 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Minutes shall must be maintained and made available to individuals upon on request. (3) Each member of a recipient rights advisory committee shall complete annual recipient rights training provided by the office of recipient rights.